Arkansas, session 2025, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Early Childhood
Education Workforce Quality Incentive Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Early childhood education workforce quality incentive
credit.
(a) There is allowed an early childhood education workforce quality
incentive credit against the income tax imposed by this chapter in the amount
provided under subsection (b) of this section for qualifying early childhood
education program directors, teachers, and instructional staff who:
(1) Are employed in an early childhood education program that
meets the requirements of the Better Beginnings quality rating system of the
*CEB004*
01-16-2025 15:51:02 CEB004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1021
Department of Education; and
(2) Earn less than the state's minimum salary for kindergarten
through grade twelve (K-12) public school teachers, as provided in § 6-17-
2403.
(b) The income tax credit allowed under this section is allowed in the
following amounts:
(1) For a taxpayer who has a Child Development Associate
certification from a program approved by the department, one thousand eight
hundred dollars ($1,800);
(2) For a taxpayer who has an Arkansas Children's Program
Administrator Credential recognized by the National Association for the
Education of Young Children, one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800);
(3) For a taxpayer who has an associate degree in early
childhood education or a related field, two thousand four hundred dollars
($2,400); and
(4) For a taxpayer who has a bachelor's degree or higher in
early childhood education or a related field, three thousand dollars
($3,000).
(c) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to
the taxpayer.
(d) To claim the income tax credit allowed under this section, the
taxpayer shall file with his or her individual income tax return an
attestation form provided by the Arkansas Professional Development Registry
of the Department of Education, verifying that the taxpayer meets the
requirements for the income tax credit allowed under this section.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/D. Garner





01-16-2025 15:51:02 CEB004